Nebraska, session 109, LB910.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB910 LB910
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Electronic device means any electronic communication device, any
computer, or any device or drive used to store data electronically;
(b) Electronic communication device has the same meaning as in
section 28-833; and
(c) Sexual offense against a child means an offense:
(a) For which registration is required under the Sex Offender
Registration Act; and
(b) That involved a victim who was younger than eighteen years of
age at the time of the offense.
(2) Upon conviction for a sexual offense against a child, the court
shall order the defendant to pay a fee of one hundred dollars for each
electronic device seized in connection with the offense. The court shall
remit such fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska State
Patrol Cash Fund. The Nebraska State Patrol shall use such fees to defray
the costs of forensic analysis of such devices.
(3) If the court finds the defendant to be indigent, the court shall
waive the fees required by this section.
-2-